Oklahoma, session 2025, SB736.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Health Care


Sharing Ministry Tax Parity Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


The Legislature finds and declares that:


1. Health care sharing ministries (HCSMs) play a significant


role in addressing medical needs for individuals and families,

Req. No. 1321 Page 1


providing financial and emotional support outside of traditional


health insurance;


2. HCSMs enable their members to share health care costs in a


voluntary and community-focused manner consistent with their ethical


and religious beliefs;


3. Despite their critical function, HCSM contributions and


payments are not currently afforded the same tax treatment as


traditional health insurance premiums under state law; and


4. To ensure fairness and eliminate financial discrimination,


this act allows HCSM members to deduct qualifying expenses and


contributions on their state income tax returns, achieving tax


parity with health insurance plans.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2358.111 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this act:


1. “Health care sharing ministry” (HCSM) means a not-for-profit


organization that is tax-exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and:


a. limits its members to those who share a common set of


ethical or religious beliefs,


b. facilitates sharing of medical expenses between


members in accordance with its published guidelines,



Req. No. 1321 Page 2


c. requires regular contributions from members with no


assumption of risk or promise to pay for medical


expenses,


d. provides a quarterly report to members detailing the


amount of needs shared and contributions received,


e. conducts annual independent audits that are publicly


available, and


f. provides a disclaimer stating that it is not an


insurance company and participation is voluntary;


2. “Qualified health care sharing expenses” means contributions


made by a qualified individual to a recognized HCSM for the purpose


of sharing medical expenses or covering administrative fees; and


3. “Qualified individual” means any resident of Oklahoma who


has been an active member of an HCSM for at least one (1) month


during the applicable tax year.


B. 1. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, a


qualified individual is entitled to deduct the total amount of


qualified health care sharing expenses paid during the taxable year


from his or her adjusted gross income (AGI) on their Oklahoma state


income tax return.


2. The deduction allowed under this section shall be applicable


to:


a. self-employed individuals, in the same manner as


deductions for health insurance premiums,

Req. No. 1321 Page 3


b. employer contributions toward HCSM membership for


employees, which shall be treated as nontaxable fringe


benefits, and


c. individuals purchasing HCSM membership for themselves


or their dependents.


C. 1. To claim the deduction, a qualified individual must:


a. submit documentation of membership and contributions


to an HCSM, including any records issued by the


ministry, and


b. file any additional forms or information required by


the Oklahoma Tax Commission to verify eligibility.


2. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall develop forms, guidelines,


and procedures for the implementation of this section.


D. Funds received by a qualified individual from HCSM members


to assist with medical expenses shall not be considered taxable


income under Oklahoma state law.


E. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall be responsible for


administering the provisions of this act. The Tax Commission shall


issue an annual report to the Legislature detailing the number of


deductions claimed, the total fiscal impact, and any other relevant


data.


F. Any individual who knowingly submits false documentation to


claim the deductions or exemptions under this act shall be subject


to:

Req. No. 1321 Page 4


1. Repayment of any income tax amount attributable to


improperly claimed deductions;


2. A civil penalty of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per


offense; and


3. Ineligibility to claim deductions under this act for a


period of three (3) years.


G. If any provision of this act is found unconstitutional or


invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remaining


provisions shall remain in full force and effect.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1321 CAD 1/19/2025 5:42:16 AM

























Req. No. 1321 Page 5